Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 3 Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia
46-3-147.
Appointment of receiver for authority for default on bonds; duties of receiver; termination of receivership; jurisdiction of court over receiver.

If the authority defaults on the payment of the principal or interest on any of the revenue bonds after the same become due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and such default continues for a period of 30 days, or if the authority or its officers, agents, or employees fail or refuse to comply with the essential provisions of this article or default in any material respect on any agreement made with the holders of the revenue bonds, any holders of revenue bonds or a trustee therefor shall have the right to apply in an appropriate judicial proceeding to the Superior Court of Fulton County for the appointment of a receiver of the undertaking, regardless of whether all revenue bonds have been declared due and payable, and regardless of whether such holder or trustee therefor is seeking or has sought to enforce any other right or exercise any remedy in connection with such revenue bonds. Upon such application, the court, if it deems such action necessary for the protection of the bondholders, may appoint a receiver for the undertaking, provided that such appointment shall be mandatory if the application is made by the holders of 25 percent in principal amount of such revenue bonds then outstanding, or by any trustee for holders of such revenue bonds in such principal amount.

A receiver appointed pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall forthwith, directly or by his agents and attorneys, enter into and upon and take possession of the project or of such portion thereof or interest therein as is owned by the authority. If the court so directs, the receiver may wholly exclude from the project the authority, its officers, agents, and employees, and all persons claiming under them. Upon taking possession of the project, the receiver shall have, hold, use, operate, manage, and control the same and each and every part thereof and, in the name of the authority or otherwise, as the receiver may deem best, shall exercise all the rights and powers of the authority with respect to the undertaking as the authority itself might do. The receiver shall maintain, restore, insure, and keep insured the project or such portion or interest therein as is owned by the authority; from time to time shall make all such necessary or proper repairs as the receiver may deem expedient; shall establish and maintain rates and collect such fees, tolls, and other charges in connection with the project as the receiver may deem necessary or proper and reasonable; and shall collect and receive all revenues, shall deposit the same in a separate account, and shall apply such revenues so collected and received in such manner as the court shall direct, provided that the duties of the receiver as described in this subsection shall be performed in a manner consistent with any and all existing contractual arrangements to which the authority may be a party; and the powers of the receiver shall be no greater than the powers of the authority.

Whenever all amounts due upon the revenue bonds and interest thereon have been cured and made good; and whenever a similar cure and making good has been effected in regard to any other notes, bonds, or other obligations, and interest thereon, which constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance on the revenues of the project under any of the terms of any covenants or agreements with holders of revenue bonds; then, if it appears to the court that no default is imminent, the court shall direct the receiver to surrender possession of the project to the authority, provided that the same right of the holders of the revenue bonds to secure the appointment of a receiver as is provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall exist upon any subsequent default.

A receiver shall, in the performance of the powers conferred upon him by this Code section, act under the direction and supervision of the court making such appointment, shall at all times be subject to the orders and decrees of such court, and may be removed thereby. Nothing contained in this Code section shall limit or restrict the jurisdiction of such court to enter such other and further orders and decrees as the court may deem necessary or appropriate for the exercise by the receiver of any functions specifically set forth in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 14; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-3-148.
Fixing, revising, and collecting fees, tolls, and charges for use of projects; application of revenues; time of payment; indemnity by political subdivisions; enforcement; assignment of payments; issuing resolutions governing disposition of revenues.

For the purpose of earning sufficient revenue to make possible the financing of the construction of the projects of the authority with revenue bonds, the authority is authorized and empowered to fix and revise rates and collect fees, tolls, and charges on each project which it causes to be acquired or constructed. Such rates, fees, tolls, and charges to be paid for the use of the facilities or services of such projects shall be so fixed and adjusted from time to time as to provide a fund which, together with other revenue, if any, of such projects or of the authority, will be sufficient:

To pay:

The costs of operating, maintaining, and repairing the projects, including reserves for insurance and extraordinary repairs, reserves for fuel, and other reserves required by the resolution, trust agreement, or indenture pertaining to such bonds and the issuance thereof, unless such costs shall be otherwise provided for;

The costs of operating and conducting the business of the authority, including salaries; fees for professional services, including legal, engineering, and others; and all expenses properly relating to the conduct of the affairs of the authority;

The costs of power, whether generated by the authority or acquired from others; and

All other costs associated with the operation of the authority and its projects and facilities;

To pay the principal of and interest on such revenue bonds as the same become due, including all premiums, if any, the proceeds of which shall have been or will be used to pay the cost of such projects, which cost shall include all elements of cost authorized by this article, including acquisition of property, whether real or personal, and any interest in property; clearing and preparing land for the purposes of this article; architectural, engineering, financial, and legal services; construction of projects authorized by this article; administrative expenses; funds for initiating the operation of the project; and interest prior to and during construction and during such period of time thereafter as may be reasonably determined by the authority to be necessary to put the project into operation;

To comply with any sinking fund requirements contained in the resolution, trust agreement, or indenture pertaining to the issuance of and security for such bonds;

To perform fully all provisions of such resolution, trust agreement, or indenture relating to the issuance of or security for such bonds to the payment of which such revenue is pledged;

To accumulate any excess income which may be required by the purchasers of such bonds or may be dictated by the requirements of such resolution, trust agreement, or indenture or by the requirements of achieving ready marketability of and low interest rates on such bonds; and

To pay expenses in connection with such bond issue or such projects, including, but not limited to, trustees’ and fiscal fees.

The rates, fees, tolls, and charges authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be payable at such intervals as may be agreed upon and set forth in the contract providing therefor. Any such contract may provide for the commencement of payments, not necessarily based directly on rates, to the authority prior to the completion of the undertaking by the authority of any such project; may provide for the making of payments during such times as such projects may be partially or wholly not in use, whether or not any such project has been completed, is then operable, or is operating; and may provide that such payments shall not be subject to any reduction, by offset or otherwise, and shall not be conditioned upon the performance or nonperformance by any party of any agreement.

Such contract may obligate the political subdivision to indemnify and save harmless the authority from any and all damage to persons and property occurring on or by reason of the project, and may also obligate the political subdivision to undertake, at the expense of the political subdivision, the defense of any action brought against the authority by reason of injury or damages to persons or property occurring on or by reason of the project.

In the event of any failure or refusal on the part of the political subdivision to perform punctually any covenant or obligation contained in any such contract, the authority may enforce performance by any legal or equitable process, including specific performance.

Any payments due or to become due to the authority pursuant to any such contract may be assigned by the authority to a trustee or paying agent as may be required by the terms of the resolution, trust agreement, or indenture relating to the issuance of and security for such bonds.

The use and disposition of the authority’s revenue shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of the trust agreement or indenture, if any, securing the same.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 18; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-3-149.
Status of authority’s funds received from revenue bonds, fees, tolls, charges, gifts, grants, or other contributions as trust funds; lien of bond owners on funds.

All funds received pursuant to authority of this article, whether as proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds or as revenues, fees, tolls, charges, or other earnings or as gifts, grants, or other contributions, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this article. The bond owners entitled to receive the benefits of such funds shall have a lien on all such funds until applied as provided in any such resolution, trust agreement, or indenture of the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 23.

46-3-150.
Audits of authority and of funds established in connection with its debt.

The authority, together with all funds established in connection with its debt, shall be audited no less frequently than annually by an independent certified public accountant to be selected by the authority. Copies of such audit shall be available upon request to interested parties, including, but without limitation, the holders of the authority’s bonds and all parties contracting with the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 11.

46-3-151.
Venue of actions.

Any action to protect or enforce any rights under this article brought in the courts of this state shall be brought in the Superior Court of Fulton County. Any action pertaining to validation of the bonds issued under this article and pertaining to validation of the contracts constituting security for bonds shall also be brought in the Superior Court of Fulton County. That court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of any action referred to in this Code section, provided that any action on any contractual obligation brought against the authority by any political subdivision contracting with the authority may be brought either in the county containing all or the largest part of the area of the political subdivision involved or in Fulton County, at the option of the party bringing the action.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 24.

46-3-152.
Jurisdiction of commission over rates, services, and practices of authority.

The rates, services, and practices relating to the generation, transmission, and sale by the authority of power to be generated from the projects authorized by this article shall not be subject to the provisions of the Georgia Public Service Commission law nor to regulation by nor jurisdiction of the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 26.

46-3-153.
Applicability of other laws to meetings and records of authority.

Meetings of the authority shall be subject to Chapter 14 of Title 50. All records of the authority shall be subject to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 25.

46-3-154.
Supplemental nature of powers conferred by article.

The provisions of this article shall be regarded as supplementary and additional to and cumulative of powers conferred by other laws and shall not be regarded as being in derogation of any powers conferred by any other law.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 29.

46-3-155.
Construction of article.

This article, being for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 28.